California, session 20252026, AB2421.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 82013 of the Government Code is amended to read:82013. “Committee” means any person or combination of persons who directly or indirectly does any of the following:(a) Receives contributions totaling two thousand dollars ($2,000) or more in a calendar year.(b) Makes independent expenditures totaling one thousand dollars ($1,000) or more in a calendar year; or(c) Makes contributions totaling ten thousand dollars ($10,000) or more in a calendar year to or at the behest of candidates or committees.A person or combination of persons that becomes a committee shall retain its status as a committee until such time as that status is terminated pursuant to Section 84214 or 84214.5.SEC. 2. Section 84214.5 is added to the Government Code, to read:84214.5. (a) (1) If the Secretary of State determines that a committee, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 82013, meets either of the conditions of termination described in paragraph (2), the Secretary of State shall provide a written notice to the committee’s treasurer and the commission that the committee may be terminated 180 days after the date the notice is sent.(2) (A) The committee failed to submit a campaign report for at least the preceding 12 months and either of the following conditions is present:(i) The committee had an ending cash balance of three thousand dollars ($3,000) or less on its last campaign statement.(ii) The committee had an ending cash balance of five thousand dollars ($5,000) or less on its last campaign statement and owes two thousand dollars ($2,000) or more to the controlling candidate.(B) The committee filed a statement of organization in error.(b) (1) If the committee or its representative, or the commission, does not file a written objection to termination with the Secretary of State within 180 days after the date the notice is sent pursuant to subdivision (a), the Secretary of State may terminate the committee.(2) Within 30 days of terminating the committee, the Secretary of State shall provide notice of the termination to the filing officer with whom the committee was required to file its last campaign statement.SEC. 3. The Legislature finds and declares that this bill furthers the purposes of the Political Reform Act of 1974 within the meaning of subdivision (a) of Section 81012 of the Government Code.